Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1662
Petit jury for subsequent periods; how drawn; how notified.

Subsequent panels of petit jurors shall be called as the judge or judges may determine during the jury term. If it is determined that a subsequent panel or panels are necessary, the judge or judges, as the case may be, shall order the jury commissioner to draw by chance such number of potential jurors as such judge or judges shall direct as petit jurors for such subsequent jury panel. The persons so drawn shall be notified or summoned the same as those drawn for the regular jury panel under section 25-1656.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 8, p. 571;

C.S.1922, § 9102;

C.S.1929, § 20-1632;

R.S.1943, § 25-1632;

Laws 1953, c. 71, § 1, p. 222;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 11(1), p. 231;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1632;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 19.

Trial courts are ordered to discontinue the practice of conducting jury selection on one day for all of the trials scheduled during a monthly term. State v. Cisneros, 248 Neb. 372, 535 N.W.2d 703 (1995).